Georgia statutes. TITLE 3 Alcoholic Beverages
PART 3 Exemptions

3-6-70.
Exemptions from tax.

The taxes imposed by this article shall not be levied with respect to:

Wine sold to and used by established and recognized churches and synagogues for use in sacramental services only;

Any sale of wine which is exempt from taxation by the state under the Constitution of the United States; or

Wine sold to persons outside this state for resale or consumption outside this state.

History.

Code 1933, § 58-803, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 1316, § 1; Code 1933, § 5A-5761, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1116, § 2.

3-6-71.
Wines containing less than one-half of 1 percent alcohol by volume.

Wines which contain less than one-half of 1 percent alcohol by volume shall not be subject to any tax levied under this title or any tax levied pursuant to authority granted by this title.

History.

Code 1981, §

3-6-71

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 562, § 2.